Maryland, session 2026, HB0535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b–1) “Cottage food business” means a business that:
(1) Produces or packages cottage food products in a residential kitchen;
(2) Sells the cottage food products in accordance with § 21–330.1 of this
subtitle and regulations adopted by the Department; and
(3) Has annual revenues from the sale of cottage food products in an
amount not exceeding [$50,000] $100,000.
(b–2) “Cottage food product” means a nonhazardous food, as specified in regulations
adopted by the Department, that is sold in the State in accordance with § 21–330.1 of this
subtitle and regulations adopted by the Department:
– 1 –

Ch. 320 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) Directly to a consumer from a residence, at a farmer’s market, at a
public event, by personal delivery, or by mail delivery; or
(2) To a retail food store, including a grocery store, or a food cooperative.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –